Hawaii, session 2025, HB1250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $67,515,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the eighteenth representative district, as follows: 1.   Kaiser high school, Oahu A.  Modernize network infrastructure and unified communications to provide for outdoor speakers, indoor paging, and an audio bell system. Design                                 $175,000 Construction                           $1,000,000 Equipment                              $325,000 Total funding                     $1,500,000 B.  Design and construct performing and visual arts complex. Design                                 $7,750,000 Construction                           $44,250,000 Total funding                     $52,000,000 C.  Modernize swimming pool system and facility to install chemical and filtration equipment, convert lighting to LED, install hand railing to bleachers, and renovate locker rooms and pool offices. Design                                 $345,000 Construction                           $2,300,000 Total funding                     $2,645,000 D.  Replacement of schoolwide public address system. Plans and Design                       $250,000 Equipment                              $1,750,000 Total funding                     $2,000,000 E. Erosion control efforts at Kaiser Stadium West, softball venues, and baseball venues. Design                                 $120,000 Construction                           $800,000 Total funding                     $920,000 F.  Install hand railings onto Kaiser Stadium bleachers. Design                                 $150,000 Construction                           $800,000 Total funding                     $950,000 G.  Modernize weightroom. Design                                 $250,000 Construction                           $1,000,000 Equipment                              $250,000 Total funding                     $1,500,000 2.   Hahaione elementary school, Oahu A. Design and construction for a covered play court. Design                                 $900,000 Construction                           $2,100,000 Total funding                     $3,000,000 B.  Heat abatement and air-conditioning improvements for forty classrooms Design                                 $200,000 Construction                           $800,000 Total funding $1,000,000 C.  Creation of an all weather fitness trail. Design                                 $500,000 Construction                           $1,500,000 Total funding                     $2,000,000 SECTION 2. The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $8,600,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the eighteenth representative district, as follows: 1.   Maunalua Bay, Oahu A.  Construction of a loading dock on the Ewa side of the launch ramp to reduce congestion on the ramp. Planning and Permitting                $400,000 Construction                           $4,400,000 Total funding                     $4,800,000 B.  Improve sea wall to prevent further erosion damage on the Koko Head side. Planning and Permitting                $400,000 Construction                           $3,400,000 Total funding                     $3,800,000 SECTION 3.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 4. The sums appropriated for the respective capital projects set forth in section 1 shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. The sums appropriated for the respective capital projects set forth in section 2 shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________